Washington statutes.
RCW 11.12.010

Who may make a will.

Any person of sound mind who has attained the age of eighteen years may, by last will, devise all his or her estate, both real and personal.

All wills executed subsequent to September 16, 1940, and which meet the requirements of this section are hereby validated and shall have all the force and effect of wills executed subsequent to the taking effect of this section.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 17 s 3; 1965 c 145 s 11.12.010. Prior: 1943 c 193 s 1; 1917 c 156 s 24; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 1394; prior: Code 1881 s 1318; 1863 p 207 s 51; 1860 p 169 s 18.]